Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.180

Legal services revolving fund—Allocation of costs to funds and agencies—Accounting—Billing.

(1) The attorney general shall keep such records as are necessary to facilitate proper allocation of costs to funds and agencies served and the director of financial management shall prescribe appropriate accounting procedures to accurately allocate costs to funds and agencies served. Billings shall be adjusted in line with actual costs incurred at intervals not to exceed six months.

(2) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, all expenses for administration of the office of the attorney general shall be allocated to and paid from the legal services revolving fund in accordance with accounting procedures prescribed by the director of financial management.

[ 2009 c 564 s 930; 2007 c 522 s 951; 2005 c 518 s 927; 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 917; 1979 c 151 s 95; 1974 ex.s. c 146 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 71 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 564: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Severability—Effective date—2007 c 522: See notes following RCW 15.64.050.

Effective date—2005 c 518: See note following RCW 28A.600.110.

Severability—Effective date—2003 1st sp.s. c 25: See notes following RCW 19.28.351.

Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 146: See note following RCW 43.10.150.